Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1728
Commission; competitive examinations; records of service; keep; subject to inspection by commission.

(1) The commission shall prepare and hold open competitive examinations in order to test the relative fitness of all applicants for appointment to the classified service. At least two weeks' notice shall be given of all such examinations by publication at least once in a legal newspaper published and of general circulation in the county or, if none is published in the county, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(2) The commission shall cause to be kept records of the service of each employee, in the classified service, known as service records. These records shall contain facts and statements on all matters relating to the character and quality of the work done and the attitude of the individual toward his or her work. All such service records and employee records shall be subject only to the inspection of the commission.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 8, p. 644;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 21.